Tennessee, session 114, HB0978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-32-104, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following:
(b) The utility shall publish the policy established pursuant to subsection (a) in a
publicly accessible location on the utility's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0978
002956
- 1 -